Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-506
Gross proceeds, defined.

Gross proceeds shall mean the total aggregate receipts received from the conduct of any lottery or raffle conducted by any qualifying nonprofit organization without any reduction for prizes, discounts, or expenses and shall include receipts from admission cost, any consideration necessary for participation, and the value of any free tickets, games, or plays used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 164.